Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE D. CRUSTACEANS AND MOLLUSKS

CHAPTER 79. EXTENDED FISHERY JURISDICTION

Sec. 79.001. COMPLIANCE. The department is authorized to cooperate with the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council established pursuant to the Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (16 U.S.C.A. Section 1801 et seq.), in developing state management programs which are consistent with plans proposed by the council and approved by the secretary of commerce.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1280, ch. 501, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1977.

Sec. 79.002. AUTHORITY. The department may follow procedures outlined in Section 12.027, Chapter 61, or Chapter 77 of this code in promulgating rules for harvest of any and all species of marine life subject to the Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (16 U.S.C.A. Section 1801 et seq.). The commission may delegate to the director the duties, responsibilities, and authority provided by this chapter for taking immediate action as necessary to modify state coastal fisheries regulations in order to provide for consistency with federal regulations in the exclusive economic zone.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1280, ch. 501, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1977. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 859, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 79.003. SUSPENSION OF OTHER LAWS. Irrespective of exclusions or limited application of the Wildlife Conservation Act of 1983 (Chapter 61 of this code) or any chapter in Title 7 of this code the commission shall exercise the authority set out in Section 79.002 of this code and conflicting provisions limiting the area, species to which applicable, or special seasons, are hereby suspended when the proclamation of the commission becomes effective, but only for the period specified in such proclamation.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1280, ch. 501, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1977. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 34, ch. 9, art. II, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 29, 1983.